Georgia statutes. TITLE 26 Food, Drugs, and Cosmetics
Article 5 Prescription Drugs
26-4-82.
Duties requiring professional judgment; responsibilities of licensed pharmacist.

In dispensing drugs, no individual other than a licensed pharmacist shall perform or conduct those duties or functions which require professional judgment. It shall be the responsibility of the supervising pharmacist to ensure that no other employee of the pharmacy, including pharmacy technicians, performs or conducts those duties or functions which require professional judgment.

For all prescriptions, it shall be the responsibility of the pharmacist on duty at a facility to ensure that only a pharmacist or a pharmacy intern under the direct supervision of a pharmacist provides professional consultation and counseling with patients or other licensed health care professionals, and that only a pharmacist or a pharmacy intern under the direct supervision of a pharmacist accepts initial telephoned prescription orders or provides information in any manner relative to prescriptions or prescription drugs.

In the dispensing of all prescription drug orders:

The pharmacist shall be responsible for all activities of the pharmacy technician in the preparation of the drug for delivery to the patient;

The pharmacist shall be present and personally supervising the activities of the pharmacy technician at all times;

When electronic systems are employed within the pharmacy, pharmacy technicians may enter information into the system and prepare labels; provided, however, that it shall be the responsibility of the pharmacist to verify the accuracy of the information entered and the label produced in conjunction with the prescription drug order;

When a prescription drug order is presented for refilling, it shall be the responsibility of the pharmacist to review all appropriate information and make the determination as to whether to refill the prescription drug order; and

Pharmacy technicians in the dispensing area shall be easily identifiable.

The board of pharmacy shall promulgate rules and regulations regarding the activities and utilization of pharmacy technicians in pharmacies, including the establishment of a registry as required in paragraph (7) of subsection (a) of Code Section 26-4-28; provided, however, that the pharmacist to pharmacy technician ratio shall not exceed one pharmacist providing direct supervision of four pharmacy technicians. The board may consider and approve an application to increase the ratio in a pharmacy located in a licensed hospital. Such application must be made in writing and must be submitted to the board by the pharmacist in charge of a specific hospital pharmacy in this state. At any time during which the pharmacist directly supervises four pharmacy technicians, two of such technicians must be certified. At any time during which the pharmacist directly supervises three pharmacy technicians, one of such technicians must be certified. No certification is required for pharmacy technicians in pharmacies at any time during which the pharmacist directly supervises one or two pharmacy technicians. In order to be certified, pharmacy technicians must:

Have successfully passed a certification program approved by the board of pharmacy;

Have successfully passed an employer’s training and assessment program which has been approved by the board of pharmacy; or

Have been certified by either the Pharmacy Technician Certification Board or any other nationally recognized certifying body approved by the board of pharmacy.

In addition to the utilization of pharmacy technicians, a pharmacist may be assisted by and directly supervise one pharmacy intern and one pharmacy extern.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-82

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 686, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1492, § 1; Ga. L. 2007, p. 229, § 2/HB 330; Ga. L. 2021, p. 83, § 1/HB 316.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in subsection (d), substituted “four” for “three” near the end of the proviso of the first sentence, substituted “At any time during which the pharmacist directly supervises four pharmacy technicians, two of such technicians must be certified.” for “One of the three” in the fourth sentence, added the fifth and sixth sentences, and added “In order to be certified, pharmacy” at the beginning of the last sentence.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2007, p. 229, § 5/HB 330, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the 2007 amendment becomes effective only if funds are specifically appropriated for purposes of the Act and shall become effective when funds so appropriated become available for expenditure. Funds were appropriated at the 2010 session of the General Assembly and thus, the 2007 amendment became effective July 1, 2010.

For application of this statute in 2020 and 2021, see Executive Orders 03.31.20.04, 01.15.21.01, 01.29.21.02, 02.15.21.01, 02.26.21.02, 03.12.21.01, 03.31.21.03, 04.30.21.01, 05.28.21.02, 06.30.21.02, 07.22.21.02, 08.19.21.02, and 09.20.21.02.

A listing of Executive Orders issued in 2020 can be found at https://gov.georgia.gov/executive-action/executive-orders/2020-executive-orders.

26-4-83.
Patient record systems.

The board of pharmacy may refuse to renew or may suspend, revoke, or restrict the licenses of or fine any person or pharmacy pursuant to the procedures set forth in this Code section and rules and regulations established by the board upon the failure to maintain an appropriate patient record system.

A patient record system shall be maintained by all pharmacies for patients for whom prescription drug orders are dispensed. The patient record system shall provide for the immediate retrieval of information necessary by the pharmacist to identify previously dispensed drugs at the time a prescription drug order is presented for dispensing. The pharmacist or the pharmacist’s designee shall make a reasonable effort to obtain, record, and maintain the following information:

The full name of the patient for whom the drug is intended;

The address and telephone number of the patient;

The date of birth of the patient; and

The gender of the patient.

The pharmacist shall make a reasonable effort to obtain from the patient or the patient’s agent and shall record any known allergies, drug reactions, idiosyncrasies, and chronic conditions or disease states of the patient and identify any other drugs, including over-the-counter drugs or devices, currently being used by the patient which may relate to prospective drug use review unless the patient or the patient’s agent refuses to provide such information. The pharmacist shall make a reasonable effort to obtain, record, and maintain the following information:

A list of all prescription drug orders obtained by the patient at the pharmacy where the prescription drug order is being filled for at least the preceding two years, showing the prescription number, the name and strength of the drug, the quantity and date dispensed, and the name of the prescribing practitioner; and

Comments from the pharmacist relevant to the individual’s drug therapy, including any other information peculiar to the specific patient or drug.

A patient record shall be maintained for a period of not less than two years from the date of the last entry in the profile record. This record may be a hard copy of a computerized form.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-83

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 686, § 1.

26-4-84.
Restriction of license for failure to review patient records and prescription drug orders.

The board of pharmacy may refuse to renew or may suspend, revoke, or restrict the licenses of or fine any person or pharmacy pursuant to the procedures set forth in this Code section upon the failure to review patient records and prescription drug orders.

A pharmacist shall review the patient record and each prescription drug order presented for dispensing for the purposes of promoting therapeutic appropriateness by identifying:

Overutilization or underutilization;

Therapeutic duplications;

Drug-disease contraindications;

Drug-drug interactions;

Incorrect drug dosage, dosage form, or duration of drug therapy;

Drug-allergy interactions; and

Clinical abuse or misuse.

Upon recognizing any of the above situations, the pharmacist shall take appropriate steps to avoid or resolve the situation or problem which shall, if necessary, include consultation with the prescribing practitioner.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-84

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 686, § 1.

26-4-85.
Patient counseling; optimizing drug therapy.

The board of pharmacy may refuse to renew or may suspend, revoke, or restrict the licenses of or fine any person or pharmacy pursuant to the procedures set forth in this Code section upon the failure to offer to counsel patients.

Upon receipt of a prescription drug order and following a review of the patient’s record, the pharmacist or the pharmacy intern operating under the direct supervision of the pharmacist shall personally offer to discuss matters which will enhance or optimize drug therapy with each patient or caregiver of such a patient. Such discussion shall be in person, whenever practicable, or by telephone and shall include appropriate elements of patient counseling, based on the professional judgment of the pharmacist. Such elements may include but are not limited to the following:

The name and description of the drug;

The dosage form, dose, route of administration and duration of therapy;

The intended use of the drug and expected action or result;

Any special directions or precautions for preparation, administration, or use by the patient;

Common severe side effects or adverse effects or interactions and therapeutic contraindications that may be encountered, including their avoidance, and the action required if such side effect, adverse effect, interaction, or therapeutic contraindication occurs;

Techniques for self-monitoring of drug therapy;

The proper storage of the drug;

Prescription refill information;

The action to be taken in the event of a missed dose; and

The comments of the pharmacist relevant to the patient’s drug therapy, including any other information peculiar to the specific patient or drug.

Additional forms of patient information may be used to supplement verbal patient counseling when appropriate or available.

Patient counseling, as described in this Code section, shall not be required for:

In-patients of a hospital or institution where other health care professionals are authorized to administer the drug or drugs;

Inmates of corrections institutions where pharmacy services are provided by the Department of Corrections or by a county or municipal political subdivision either directly or by a subcontractor of the above; or

Patients receiving drugs from the Department of Public Health; provided, however, that pharmacists who provide drugs to patients in accordance with Code Section 43-34-23 shall include in all dispensing procedures a written process whereby the patient or the caregiver of the patient is provided with the information required under this Code section.

A pharmacist shall not be required to counsel a patient or the caregiver of the patient when the patient or the caregiver of the patient refuses such consultation or counseling.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-85

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 686, § 1; Ga. L. 2007, p. 229, § 3/HB 330; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2009, p. 859, § 7/HB 509; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 5-7/HB 214.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1998, a comma was inserted following “administration” in paragraph (b)(4) and “taken” was substituted for “take” in paragraph (b)(9).

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

26-4-86.
Compounding and distribution of drug products.

The board shall establish rules and regulations governing the compounding and distribution of drug products by pharmacists, practitioners, and pharmacies licensed or registered by this state. Such rules and regulations shall include provisions ensuring compliance with USP-NF standards.

All drug products compounded and labeled in accordance with board rules regarding pharmaceutical compounding shall be deemed to meet the labeling requirements of Chapter 13 of Title 16 and Chapters 3 and 4 of this title.

All drug products compounded by a licensed outsourcing facility shall also be compounded in accordance with applicable current good manufacturing practices established by the federal Food and Drug Administration.

In regards to pharmacists compounding nonpatient-specific sterile drugs to be provided to practitioners to use in patient care or altering or repackaging such drugs for practitioners to use in patient care in the practitioner’s office, such nonpatient-specific sterile compounding shall only be conducted by an outsourcing facility and as allowed by applicable federal law and board rule for pharmaceutical compounding using USP-NF standards for sterile compounding. Such sterile drugs may be compounded only in quantities determined by board rule following consultation with the Georgia Composite Medical Board. No Schedule II, III, IV, or V controlled substance, as defined in Article 2 of Chapter 13 of Title 16, shall be eligible for such designation. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to apply to pharmacies owned or operated by institutions or to pharmacists or practitioners within or employed by an institution or affiliated entity; provided, however, that pharmacies owned or operated by institutions and pharmacists and practitioners within or employed by institutions or affiliated entities shall remain subject to other requirements, rules, and regulations established by the board and the federal Food and Drug Administration governing the compounding of medication.

Practitioners who may lawfully compound drugs for administering or dispensing to their own patients pursuant to Code Section 26-4-130 shall comply with all provisions of this Code section and board rules regarding pharmaceutical compounding.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to prohibit or interfere with the ability of a practitioner to compound drugs for administering or dispensing to their own patients pursuant to Code Section 26-4-130.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-86

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 686, § 1; Ga. L. 2013, p. 127, § 5/HB 209; Ga. L. 2016, p. 855, § 4/HB 926; Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 26/HB 323.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted the present provisions of this Code section for the former provisions, which read: “The board may establish regulations governing the compounding
of medication by pharmacists and pharmacies licensed in this state.”

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, in subsection (b), designated the previously existing provisions as paragraph (b)(1) and added paragraph (b)(2); in subsection (c), in the first sentence, twice inserted “nonpatient specific” and inserted “by an outsourcing facility and”, near the end of the fourth sentence, substituted “requirements, rules, and regulations” for “rules and regulations” and inserted “and the federal Food and Drug Administration”; and, in subsection (d), designated the previously existing provisions as paragraph (d)(1) and added paragraph (d)(2).

The 2017 amendment,

effective May 9, 2017, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, added a hyphen to “nonpatient-specific” twice in the first sentence of subsection (c).

26-4-87.
Storage and handling of controlled substances and dangerous drugs.

The board shall promulgate rules and regulations governing the appropriate and proper storage and handling of controlled substances and dangerous drugs as defined in Chapter 13 of Title 16 which are consistent with those standards established by the United States Pharmacopeial Convention.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-87

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 686, § 1.

26-4-88.
Restrictions on dispensing of medicines, drugs, or poisons; functions which require the professional judgment of a pharmacist.

No person shall engage in the dispensing of any medicines, drugs, or poisons unless said person is a pharmacist licensed in accordance with this chapter or a pharmacy intern dispensing such items in accordance with this chapter.

Except as otherwise required pursuant to Code Section 26-4-86, this chapter shall not apply to practitioners of the healing arts prescribing, compounding their own prescriptions, or dispensing drugs or medicines except as provided in Code Section 26-4-130.

Nothing in this Code section shall prohibit any person from assisting any duly licensed pharmacist or practitioner, provided that such duly licensed pharmacist or practitioner shall be physically present in the prescription area and actually observing the actions of such person performing such tasks; provided, further, that no prescription shall be given to the person requesting the same unless the contents and the label thereof shall have been verified by a licensed pharmacist or practitioner.

With respect to pharmacy technicians, the following functions require the professional judgment of a pharmacist, or pharmacy intern under the supervision of a pharmacist, and may not be performed by a pharmacy technician:

Acceptance of initial oral prescriptions;

Certification of a filled or finished prescription or prescription drug order;

Weighing or measuring active ingredients without a mechanism of verification;

Reconstitution of prefabricated medication without a mechanism of verification;

Verification of the constituents of final IV admixtures for accuracy, efficacy, and patient utilization;

Entry of orders on patient medication profiles without verification by a pharmacist; and

Provision of drug information that has not been prepared or approved by the pharmacist.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-88

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 686, § 1; Ga. L. 2013, p. 127, § 6/HB 209.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “Except as otherwise required pursuant to Code Section 26-4-86, this chapter shall not apply” for “This chapter shall not apply” at the beginning of subsection (b).

26-4-89.
Selling drugs in vending machines prohibited; remote automated medication system excluded.

Any person who shall sell or dispense drugs by the use of vending machines shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

A remote automated medication system shall not be considered a vending machine for purposes of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-89

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 686, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 81, § 26; Ga. L. 2011, p. 308, § 8/HB 457.

26-4-90.
Remuneration for professional pharmacy care services.

Nothing in this chapter shall be interpreted to prohibit a pharmacist or pharmacy from being remunerated for professional pharmacy care services.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-90

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 686, § 1.